Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 5
METROPOLITAN SEWAGE DISPOSAL DISTRICTS

32-4-501. Legislative declaration.

It is declared that the organization of metropolitan sewage disposal districts having the purposes and powers provided in this article will serve a public use and will promote the public health, safety, and general welfare.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 162, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-1.

32-4-502. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Acquisition" or "acquire" means the purchase, construction, reconstruction, lease, gift, transfer, assignment, option to purchase, grant from the federal government, from any public body, or from any person, endowment, bequest, devise, installation, condemnation, other contract, or other acquirement, or any combination thereof, of facilities, other property, any project, or an interest therein authorized in this part 5.

"Board of directors" or "board" means the board of directors of a metropolitan sewage disposal district.

"Clerk" means that official of a municipality or a district who performs duties ordinarily performed by a city clerk, town clerk, or a secretary of a corporation.

"Compensating reservoir" means the structures, facilities, and appurtenances for the impounding, transportation, and release of water for the replenishment or replacement in periods of drought or at other necessary times of all or a part of waters in or bordering the state diverted into any sewer, sewer system, intercepting sewer, or sewage disposal system appertaining to a district.

"Condemnation" or "condemn" means the acquisition by the exercise of the power of eminent domain of property for any facilities, other property, project, or an interest therein, authorized in this part 5. A district may exercise in the state the power of eminent domain, either within or without the district, and in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use may take any property necessary to carry out any of the objects or purposes hereof, whether such property is already devoted to the same use by any municipality or other public body or otherwise, and may condemn any existing works or improvements used in the district. The power of eminent domain vested in the board shall include the power to condemn, in the name of the district, either the fee simple or any lesser estate or interest in any real property which the board by resolution determines is necessary for carrying out the purposes of this part 5. A district shall not abandon any condemnation proceedings subsequent to the date upon which it has taken possession of the property being acquired. In the event the construction of any sewage disposal system or project authorized in this part 5, or any part thereof, makes necessary the removal and relocation of any public utilities, whether on private or public right-of-way, the district shall reimburse the owner of such public utility facility for the expense of such removal and relocation, including the cost of any necessary land or rights in land.

"Cost" or "cost of any project", or words of similar import mean in addition to the usual connotations thereof, the cost of acquisition or improvement and equipment of all or any part of a sewage disposal system and of all or any property, rights, easements, privileges, agreements, and franchises deemed by the district to be necessary or useful and convenient therefor or in connection therewith, including interest or discount on bonds, cost of issuance of bonds, engineering and inspection costs, and legal expenses, cost of financial, professional, and other estimates and advice, contingencies, any administrative, operating, and other expenses of the district prior to and during such acquisition or improvement and equipment, and additionally during a period of not exceeding one year after the completion thereof, as may be estimated and determined by the board in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any securities or other instrument appertaining thereto or in any contract with any municipality, or otherwise, and all such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing, acquisition, improvement, equipment, and completion of said sewage disposal system or part thereof and the placing of the same in operation, and also such provision or reserves for working capital, operation, maintenance, or replacement expenses or for payment or security of principal of or interest on any securities during or after such acquisition or improvement and equipment as the district may determine, and also reimbursements to the district or any municipality or person of any moneys theretofore expended for the purposes of the district or to any municipality or other public body or the federal government of any moneys theretofore expended for or in connection with sanitation facilities.

"Disposal" or "dispose" means the sale, destruction, razing, loan, lease, gift, grant, transfer, assignment, mortgage, option to sell, other contract, or other disposition, or any combination thereof, of facilities, other property, any project, or an interest therein authorized in this part 5.

"District" means a metropolitan sewage disposal district formed under the provisions of this part 5 or as changed from time to time. A district formed under this part 5 shall not be considered a political subdivision for the purposes of section 8-3-104 (12), C.R.S.

"Engineer" means any engineer regularly employed by the district or any competent engineer or firm or association of engineers employed by the district in connection with any facility, property, project, or power authorized in this part 5.

"Equipment" or "equip" means the furnishing of all necessary or desirable, related or appurtenant, machinery and other facilities, or any combination thereof, appertaining to any property, project, or interest therein authorized in this part 5.

"Executive" means the chief executive elected official of a municipality as defined in subsection (19) of this section by whatever name he may be designated.

"Federal government" means the United States, or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof.

"Governing body" means the city council of a city or of a city and county, the board of trustees of an incorporated town, the board of directors of a sanitation district or of a water and sanitation district, or the governing body of any other municipality by law authorized to impose the obligations contemplated by this part 5, regardless of how the governing body may be designated.

"Herein", "hereby", "hereunder", "hereof", "hereto", "hereinabove", "hereinbefore", and "hereinafter" refer to this metropolitan sewage disposal district law and not solely to the particular portion thereof in which such word is used.

"Improvement" or "improve" means the extension, betterment, alteration, reconstruction, replacement, repair, or other improvement, or any combination thereof, of facilities, other property, any project, or an interest therein authorized in this part 5.

"Industrial wastes" means liquid or other wastes resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business or from the development of any natural resource.

"Intercepting sewer" is considered as only such sewer and appurtenances thereto as may be necessary to intercept and transport the outfalls from the sewer systems of the municipalities included within the boundaries of the district.

"Metropolitan sewage disposal district" means a district organized under this part 5 either as originally organized or as changed from time to time.

"Municipality" means a city, a city and county, an incorporated town, a sanitation district, or a water and sanitation district, and any other political subdivision or public entity created under the laws of the state of Colorado having specific boundaries within which it is authorized to provide sewer service for the area within its boundaries, other than a metropolitan sewage disposal district.

"Ordinance" means the formal action taken by a "governing body", as defined in subsection (13) of this section, whether it is in the form of an ordinance, resolution, or other form.

"Person" means any individual, association, corporation, or the federal government, or any public body other than a municipality, and excluding a district.

"Pollution" or "pollute" means the condition of water resulting from the introduction therein of substances of a kind and in quantities rendering it detrimental or immediately or potentially dangerous to the public health, or unfit for public or commercial use.

"Project" means any public structure, facility, or undertaking or sewage disposal system which a district is authorized in this part 5 to acquire, improve, equip, maintain, and operate. A project may consist of all kinds of personal and real property. Any project of a district shall appertain to a sewage disposal system as defined in subsection (31) of this section and authorized by this part 5.

"Property" means real property and personal property.

"Public body" means the state of Colorado, or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof, or any county, municipality, or other city or town, or other type of quasi-municipal district, or any other political subdivision of the state, excluding a metropolitan sewage disposal district and excluding the federal government.

"Publication" means three consecutive weekly publications in at least one newspaper having general circulation in the district. It shall not be necessary that an advertisement be made on the same day of the week in each of the three weeks, but not less than fourteen days, excluding the day of first publication but including the day of the last publication, shall intervene between the first publication and the last publication, and publication shall be complete on the date of the last publication.

"Real property" means:

Land, including land under water;

Buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements on land;

Any property appurtenant to or used in connection with land;

Water and water rights appertaining to any project;

Every estate, interest, privilege, easement, franchise, and right in land, legal or equitable, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, rights-of-way, terms for years, and liens, charges or encumbrances by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such liens.

"Securities" means any bonds, interim receipts or certificates, warrants, debentures, notes, or other obligations of a district or any public body appertaining to any project, or interest therein, authorized in this part 5, or otherwise.

"Service charges" are the rents, rates, fees, tolls, or other charges for direct or indirect connection with, or the use or services of, a sewage disposal system or sewer system, as more specifically provided in section 32-4-522 and elsewhere in this part 5.

"Sewage" means the water-carried wastes created in and carried, or to be carried, away from residences, hotels, apartments, schools, hospitals, industrial establishments, or any other public or private building, together with such surface or groundwater and industrial wastes as are present.

"Sewage disposal system" includes any one or all or any combination of the following: Any sewage treatment plant, sewage treatment works, sewage disposal facilities, connections and outfalls, intercepting sewers, outfall sewers, force mains, conduits, pipelines, water lines, pumping and ventilating plants or stations, compensating reservoirs, other plants, structures, facilities, equipment, and appurtenances useful or convenient for the interception, transportation, treatment, purification, or disposal of sewage, liquid wastes, solid wastes, night soil, and industrial wastes, and all necessary lands, interest in lands, easements, and water rights.

(31.5) "Sewer connection" means any physical connection to a sewage disposal system or sewer system, whether direct or indirect, of a residence building, dwelling, dwelling unit, or other building, including individual units of multiple unit dwellings such as condominiums, townhouses, multiplexes, and apartment buildings.

"Sewer system" means a system provided by a municipality to provide sewer service to its inhabitants to the point of its connection with a sewage disposal system as defined in subsection (31) of this section which intercepts, receives, transports, treats, and disposes of the outfalls from such sewer systems.

(32.5) "Single-family equivalent" means the capacity of sewer service or water service required for a single-family household. For a multiple unit dwelling, each single-family household within such a dwelling shall be considered as having one single-family equivalent.

"State" means the state of Colorado, or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation thereof.

"Taxation" or "tax" means general ad valorem taxes.

"Taxpaying elector" and "eligible elector" of a district have the meanings, respectively, as specified in section 32-1-103; except that, to qualify as a taxpaying elector or as an eligible elector for the purposes of this part 5, a person must also be a resident of a municipality, as defined in subsection (19) of this section.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 162, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-2.

L. 62:

pp. 180, 182, §§ 1, 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-2.

L. 70:

p. 286, § 84.

L. 81:

(31.5) and (32.5) added, p. 1637, § 1, effective May 18; (35) amended, p. 1624, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(35) amended, p. 894, § 137, effective January 1, 1993.

32-4-503. Liberal construction.

This part 5 being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, and general welfare, the rule of strict construction shall have no application to this part 5, but it shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes and objects for which this part 5 is intended.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 179, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-18.

L. 62:

p. 199, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-18.

32-4-504. Sufficiency of part 5.

This part 5, without reference to other statutes of the state, shall constitute full authority for the exercise of powers granted in this part 5, including but not limited to the authorization and issuance of securities under this part 5. No other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of securities that provides for an election requires an approval, or in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts in this part 5 authorized to be done, shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken under this part 5 or acts done pursuant hereto, except for laws to which reference is made in this part 5 specifically or by necessary implication. The provisions of no other law, either general or local, except as provided in this part 5, shall apply to doing of the things in this part 5 authorized to be done, and no board, agency, bureau, commission, or official, other than the board of directors of a metropolitan sewage disposal district or the governing body of a municipality, has any authority or jurisdiction over the doing of any of the acts in this part 5 authorized to be done.

No notice, consent, or approval by any public body or officer thereof shall be required as a prerequisite to the sale or issuance of any securities or the making of any contract or the exercise of any other power under this part 5, except as provided in this part 5. The powers conferred by this part 5 shall be in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this part 5 shall not affect the powers conferred by, any other law.

Nothing in this part 5 shall repeal or affect any other law or part thereof, except to the extent that this part 5 is inconsistent with any other law, it being intended that this part 5 shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objectives, and not an exclusive one; and this part 5 shall not be construed as repealing, amending, or changing any such other law except to the extent of such inconsistency.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 179, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-19.

L. 62:

p. 199, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-19.

32-4-505. Limitation on scope of part 5.

Nothing in this part 5 shall be construed as affecting in any manner the operation, improvement, or enlargement, or any combination thereof, of a privately owned sewage disposal system which exists outside the boundaries of a municipality as they existed on or after February 21, 1962.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 220, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-38.

32-4-506. Purpose, boundaries, and powers.

Metropolitan sewage disposal districts may be organized under this part 5 for the purpose of acquiring, by construction or otherwise, owning, holding, and operating a sewage disposal system to intercept, receive, transport, treat, and dispose of the outfalls of sewer systems of municipalities. A district may be composed of territory included within the corporate boundaries of any two or more municipalities, which need not be contiguous and which need not be located in the same county. When so organized each such district shall be a governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado with such powers as are expressly granted in this part 5 together with such powers as are reasonably implied therefrom and necessary or proper to carry out the objects and purposes of such district.

It is the purpose of this part 5 that the municipalities within a district shall retain full power to provide sewer service to its inhabitants and to authorize a district to intercept, receive, transport, treat, and dispose of the outfalls from the sewer systems of the municipalities within the district.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 164, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-3.

32-4-507. Powers of public bodies.

The governing body of any municipality or other public body, upon its behalf and in its name, for the purpose of aiding and cooperating in any project authorized in this part 5, upon the terms and with or without consideration and with or without an election, as the governing body determines, has power under this part 5:

To sell, lease, loan, donate, grant, convey, assign, transfer, and otherwise dispose to the district of sewers, sewage facilities, and sewer improvements, or any combination thereof;

To make available for temporary use or otherwise dispose of to the district any machinery, equipment, facilities, and other property, and any agents, employees, persons with professional training, and any other persons, to effect the purposes of this part 5. Any such property owned and persons in the employ of any public body while engaged in performing for the district any service, activity, or undertaking authorized in this part 5, pursuant to contract or otherwise, shall have all the powers, privileges, immunities, rights, and duties of, and shall be deemed to be engaged in the service and employment of, such public body, notwithstanding such service, activity, or undertaking is being performed in or for a district.

To enter into any agreement or joint agreement between or among the federal government, the district, and any other public body, or any combination thereof, which is mutually agreed thereby, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, respecting action or proceedings appertaining to any power granted in this part 5, and the use or joint use of any facilities, project, or other property authorized in this part 5;

To sell, lease, loan, donate, grant, convey, assign, transfer, or pay over to a district any facilities or any project authorized in this part 5, or any part thereof, or any interest in real or personal property, or any funds available for acquisition, improvement, or equipment purposes, including the proceeds of any securities issued for acquisition, improvement, or equipment purposes which may be used by the district in the acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, or operation of any facilities or project authorized in this part 5;

To transfer, grant, convey, or assign and set over to a district any contracts which have been awarded by the public body for the acquisition, improvement, or equipment of any project not begun, or if begun, not completed;

To budget and appropriate, and each municipality or other public body is required and directed to budget and appropriate, from time to time, general ad valorem tax proceeds, service charges, and other revenues legally available therefor to pay all obligations arising from the exercise of any powers granted in this part 5 as such obligations accrue and become due, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, service charges fixed by the district;

To prescribe and enforce reasonable rules and regulations, not in conflict with any such rule or regulation of the district, for the availability of service from, the connection with, the use of, and the disconnection from the sewer system of the public body or other sanitation or sewer facilities thereof;

To provide for an agency, by any agreement authorized in this part 5, to administer or execute that or any collateral agreement, which agency may be one of the parties to the agreement, or a commission or board constituted pursuant to the agreement;

To provide that any such agency shall possess the common power specified in the agreement, and may exercise it in the manner or according to the method provided in the agreement. Such power is subject to the restrictions upon the manner of exercising the power of any one of the contracting parties, which party shall be designated by the agreement.

To continue any agreement authorized in this part 5 until rescinded or terminated, which agreement may provide for the method by which it may be rescinded or terminated by any party.

All of the powers, privileges, immunities, and rights, exemptions from laws, ordinances, and rules and all pension, relief, disability, workers' compensation, and other benefits which apply to the activity of officers, agents, or employees of any such district or public body when performing their respective functions within the territorial limits of their respective public agencies shall apply to them to the same degree and extent while engaged in the performance of any of their functions and duties extraterritorially under this part 5.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 200, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-20.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 572, § 65, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(c) and (1)(j) amended, p. 21, § 1, effective March 4.

32-4-508. Organization.

A district shall be organized in the following manner:

The governing body of any municipality may enact an ordinance declaring that the public health, safety, and general welfare require the organization of a district, which ordinance shall set forth, among other things, the following:

The name of the proposed district;

The municipalities proposed to be included in the proposed district;

The municipalities which shall be required to take action to be included within the district before the district becomes organized. This requirement may be met by designating by name those municipalities which are required to take action to be included within the district before the district shall be organized or by designating alternative groups of municipalities which are required to take action to be included within the district before the district shall be organized, or by designating a percentage of those municipalities named which shall be required to take action to be included within the district before the district shall be organized.

The time limit within which action must be taken by the municipalities so named to be included within the district, which time shall not exceed six months from the final adoption of the initiating ordinance.

Upon the final adoption of an initiating ordinance, the clerk of the governing body shall mail a certified copy thereof to each municipality named therein and to the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

After receipt of a copy of such ordinance from the initiating governing body, the governing body of any municipality, which is named in the ordinance proposing the district, and which desires to include such municipality within the district, may enact an ordinance setting forth:

A copy of the initiating ordinance;

That such a district will serve a public use and will promote the public health, safety, and general welfare;

That the municipality shall be included in said district if and when the same is organized as set forth in the initiating ordinance.

Before final adoption of any ordinance under paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection (1), the governing body of each such municipality shall hold a public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be given by publication, which publication shall be complete at least ten days before the hearing.

The clerk of each governing body, upon the final adoption of such ordinance, shall forthwith transmit a certified copy thereof to the governing body of every other municipality named in the initiating ordinance, including the municipality which adopted the initiating ordinance, and to the division of local government.

The division of local government, upon receipt of a certified copy of such ordinance from the clerk of the governing body of each of those municipalities which satisfy the requirements for organization as set forth in the initiating ordinance, shall forthwith issue a certificate reciting that the district named in the ordinance has been duly organized according to the laws of the state of Colorado, and setting forth the names of the municipalities which are included within the district. The organization of any district shall be deemed effective upon the date of issuance of such certificate, and the validity of the organization of any such district shall be incontestable in any suit or proceeding which shall not be commenced within three months from such date.

The division of local government shall forthwith transmit to the governing body of each municipality which has certified an adopting ordinance three copies of such certificate, and the clerk of each such governing body shall forthwith record a copy in the offices of the clerk and recorder of the county or counties in which the municipality is wholly or partly located and shall forthwith file a copy of said certificate in the office of the county assessor and county treasurer of each county in which said municipality is located. Additional copies of such certificate shall be issued by said division upon request.

Only such municipalities as enact an ordinance to become a part of the district shall be joined therein. No district shall be deemed to have been organized unless those municipalities which are required by the initiating ordinance to take action to be included within the district take such action within the limit of time specified in the initiating ordinance.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 164, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-4.

L. 76:

(1)(b), (1)(e), and (1)(f) amended, p. 600, § 17, effective July 1.